Vermont statutes. TITLE 3A Executive Orders
Chapter 29. Public Property and Supplies
Executive Order No. 29-21
(No. 81-89) [Transfer of Lands in Town of Wilmington From Agency of Environmental Conservation, Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation, to Agency of Transportation.

WHEREAS, it appears that certain lands hereinafter described and located in the Town of Wilmington, County of Windham and State of Vermont and presently under the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Environmental Conservation; Forests, Parks and
Recreation Department; and

WHEREAS, the Agency of Transportation desires the use of said land and premises for its purposes;

NOW THEREFORE, I, Madeleine M. Kunin, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor of Vermont do hereby transfer and set over to the Agency of Transportation jurisdiction and control over certain lands of the Agency of Environmental Conservation; Forests,
Parks and Recreation Department for its purposes; said lands being more particularly described as follows:

Being part of the same land and premises conveyed to the State of Vermont by Olga Haslund by Warranty Deed dated August 5, 1940 and recorded in Book 31, Page 88 of the Town of Wilmington Land Records; said land being designated as Parcels #26A, 26B, and
26C as shown on Pages 15, 30 and 31 of the plans of Highway Project Wilmington F 010-1 (19), a plat of which is attached hereto and made a part hereof, and with reference to said plat being more particularly described as follows:

Parcel #26A: Beginning at a point in the existing southwesterly right of way boundary of Vermont Route #9, 90 feet distant northeasterly at right angle from approximate station 334 + 10 of the established centerline (established centerline hereinafter
referred to as CL) of Highway Project Wilmington F 010-1 (19);

thence 437 feet, more or less, southeasterly, easterly and southeasterly along the aforesaid existing southwesterly right of way boundary of Vermont Route #9 to a point 78 feet distant northeasterly, at right angle from approximate station 338 + 45 of
said CL;

thence 100 feet, more or less, southwesterly and crossing said CL to a point 5 feet distant southwesterly at right angle from approximate station 337 + 86 of said CL;

thence 96 feet, more or less, southeasterly to a point 18 feet distant southwesterly at right angle from approximate station 338 + 80 of said CL;

thence 105 feet, more or less, northeasterly and crossing said CL to a point in the aforesaid existing southwesterly right of way boundary of Vermont Route #9, 67 feet distant northeasterly at right angle from approximate station 339 + 43 of said CL;

thence 309 feet, more or less, southeasterly along the aforesaid existing southwesterly right of way boundary of Vermont Route #9 and crossing said CL to a point 10 feet distant southwesterly at right angle from approximate station 342 + 40 of said CL;

thence 55 feet, more or less, southwesterly to a point 65 feet distant southwesterly at right angle from approximate station 342 + 43 of said CL;

thence 843 feet, more or less, northwesterly and parallel to said CL to a point 65 feet distant southwesterly at right angle from approximate station 334 + 00 of said CL;

thence 155 feet, more or less, northeasterly and crossing said CL to the point of beginning.

Said Parcel #26A contains 2.38 acres, more or less.

Parcel #26B: Beginning at a point existing Vermont Route #9, 140 feet distant northeasterly at right angle from approximate station 334 + 10 of the established centerline (established centerline hereinafter referred to as CL) of Highway Project Wilmington
F 010- (19);

thence 439 feet, more or less, southeasterly to a point 106 feet distant northeasterly at right angle from approximate station 338 + 47 of said CL;

thence 28 feet, more or less, southwesterly to a point in the existing southwesterly right of way boundary of Vermont Route #9, 78 feet distant northeasterly at right angle from approximate station 338 + 45 of said CL;

thence 437 feet, more or less, northwesterly, westerly and northwesterly along the aforesaid existing southwesterly right of way boundary of Vermont Route #9 to a point 90 feet distant northeasterly at right angle from approximate station 334 + 10 of
said CL;

thence 50 feet, more or less, northeasterly to the point of beginning.

Said Parcel #26B contains 0.34 acre, more or less.

Parcel #26C: Beginning at a point in existing Vermont Route #9, 93 feet distant northeasterly at right angle from approximate station 339 + 47 of the established centerline (established centerline hereinafter referred to as CL) of Highway Project Wilmington
F 010-1 (19);

thence 313 feet, more or less, southeasterly to a point 20 feet distant northeasterly at right angle from approximate station 342 + 52 of said CL;

thence 31 feet, more or less, southwesterly and crossing said CL to a point in the existing southwesterly right of way boundary of Vermont Route #9, 10 feet distant southwesterly at right angle from approximate station 342 + 40 of said CL;

thence 309 feet, more or less, northwesterly along the aforesaid existing southwesterly right of way boundary of Vermont Route #9 and crossing said CL to a point 67 feet distant northeasterly at right angle from approximate station 339 + 43 of said CL;

thence 26 feet, more or less, northeasterly to the point of beginning.

Said Parcel #26C contains 0.21 acre, more or less.

Also included in this transfer are the following easements and/or rights required for the construction of Highway Project Wilmington F 010-1 (19):

A temporary easement during the period of construction to enter upon land under the jurisdiction of the Agency of Environmental Conservation; Forests, Parks and Recreation Department to construct a drive at or near and right of approximate survey station
338 + 62 of the established centerline of said Highway Project.

A temporary easement during the period of construction to enter upon land under the jurisdiction of the Agency of Environmental Conservation; Forests, Parks and Recreation Department for construction purposes including the right to cut and dispose of
all trees, down timber, stubs, brush, bushes, and debris in an area which contains 0.05 acre, more or less, and is located right of and between approximate survey stations 339 + 89 and 342 + 33 of the established centerline of said
Highway Project.

A temporary easement during the period of construction to extend highway slopes and embankments in a total area of 0.02 acre, more or less, as shown on Pages 15, 30 and 31 of the plans of said Highway Project a plat of which is attached hereto and made
a part of. The slopes and embankments may be extended at such an angle as will hold the material of said slopes in repose against ordinary erosion in accordance with the standard practice of highway construction. The Agency of Transportation
shall have the right to remove all trees, logs, stumps, protruding roots, brush, duff and other objectionable materials, structures, growth and any other thing of whatever kind or nature from said slope areas.

Dated Dec. 28, 1989.

Executive Order No. 29-22
(No. 07-91) [Transfer of Certain Land in Town of Alburg from Agency of Transportation to Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Fish and Wildlife.

WHEREAS, it appears that certain land hereinafter described and located in the Town of Alburg, County of Grand Isle, State of Vermont and presently under the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Transportation, is no longer necessary for Agency of
Transportation purposes; and

WHEREAS, the Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Fish and Wildlife desires the transfer of said hereinafter described land for the purpose of enhancing already existing recreational facilities;

NOW, THEREFORE, I, Richard A. Snelling, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor of Vermont do hereby transfer and set over from the Agency of Transportation to the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Fish
and Wildlife for the aforesaid purpose the following described land, to wit:

Beginning at a point in U.S Route 2, 44.0´ more or less left of and at right angles to the established centerline at approximate survey station 77 + 00, as shown on Project BRF 028-1(11) Fishing Access Plan; thence easterly and parallel to said center
line 675´ more or less to a point, said point being 44.0´ left of and at right angles to approximate survey station 83 + 75 of said Project. Meaning to transfer all of the lands lying north of the above described line consisting of
the Fishing Access Area as it presently exists and encompassing 1.77 acres, more or less. A plat depicting the above described parcel is attached hereto and made a part thereof.

Being part of the land and premises conveyed to the State of Vermont by Quit-Claim Deed from the Lake Champlain Bridge Commission on September 16, 1987, and recorded in the Town of Alburg Land Records on November 13, 1987 in Book 57, Pages 137-140.

This Executive Order takes effect upon signing.

Dated June 7, 1991.

Executive Order No. 29-23
(No. 04-92) [Transfer of Certain Land in Town of Stockbridge From Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Fish and Wildlife to Agency of Transportation.

WHEREAS, it appears that a portion of certain land in the Town of Stockbridge, County of Windsor, and State of Vermont which is presently under the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Fish and Wildlife, is necessary
for highway purposes in connection with Highway Project Stockbridge BRF 022-1 (13); and

WHEREAS, the Agency of Transportation is charged with and has the responsibility for planning, constructing, and maintaining all such highways;

NOW THEREFORE, I, Howard Dean, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor of Vermont do hereby transfer and set over from the Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Fish and Wildlife, to the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Transportation
for the aforesaid purposes the following described lands and easements to wit:

Being part of the same land and premises conveyed to the State of Vermont by Thomas G. Rabeck and Lauren S. Rabeck by Warranty Deed dated April 11, 1978 and recorded in Book 36, Pages 317-319, of the Town of Stockbridge Land Records, and being further
described as Parcels #5A and 5B consisting of land and rights therein as shown on Pages 11 and 12 of the plans of Highway Project Stockbridge BRF 022-1 (13) as filed on the 7th day of August, 1991, in the office of the Clerk of the
Town of Stockbridge. Said land and rights are more particularly described as follows:

Parcel #5A:

Beginning at a point in the existing southwesterly right-of-way boundary of Vermont Route 107, approximately 33 feet distant southwesterly at right angle from station 13 + 76 of the established centerline (established centerline hereinafter referred to
as CL) of said Highway Project;

thence 274 feet, more or less, southeasterly along said existing southwesterly right-of-way boundary of Vermont Route #107, to a point approximately 33 feet distant southwesterly radially from station 16 + 50 of said CL;

thence 51 feet, more or less, northwesterly to a point 42 feet distant southwesterly radially from station 16 + 00 of said CL;

thence 224 feet, more or less, northwesterly and parallel to said CL to a point 42 feet distant southwesterly at right angle from station 13 + 76 of said CL;

thence 9 feet, more or less, northeasterly to the point of beginning;

This parcel of land contains 0.05 acre, more or less.

Parcel #5B:

Beginning at a point in the existing southwesterly right-of-way boundary of Vermont Route #107, approximately 33 feet distant southwesterly at right angle from approximate station 11 + 07 of said CL;

thence 55 feet, more or less, southeasterly along an irregular line to a point in the center of existing Vermont Route #107 at approximate station 11 + 50 on said CL;

thence 575 feet, more or less, southeasterly along the center of existing Vermont Route #107 to a point at approximate station 17 + 25 on said CL;

thence 33 feet, more or less, southwesterly to a point in the existing southwesterly right-of-way boundary of Vermont Route #107, approximately 33 feet distant southwesterly radially from approximate station 17 + 25 of said CL;

thence 618 feet, more or less, northwesterly along the aforesaid existing southwesterly right-of-way boundary of Vermont Route #107 to the point of beginning.

This parcel of land contains 0.45 acre, more or less, and is located within the existing right-of-way of Vermont Route #107.

Also included in this transfer are the following described easements and/or rights:

A temporary easement during the period of construction to enter upon land of the Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Fish and Wildlife, to construct a temporary bridge and detour in an area which contains 0.29 acre, more or less, and is located
right of and between approximate stations 9 + 91 and 13 + 50 of said CL.

An easement to extend highway slopes and embankments in an area of 0.08 acre, more or less, and a temporary easement during the period of construction to extend highway slopes and embankments in an area of 0.01 acre, more or less, as shown on Pages 11
and 12 of said filed Highway Project plans.

The slopes and embankments may be extended at such an angle as will hold the material of said slopes in repose against ordinary erosion in accordance with the standard practice of highway construction. The Agency of Transportation shall have the right
to remove all trees, logs, stumps, protruding roots, brush, duff and other objectionable materials, structures, growth and any other thing of whatever kind or nature from said slope areas.

A temporary easement during the period of construction to enter upon land of the Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Fish and Wildlife, to construct a drive right of and between approximate stations 11 + 15 and 14 + 00 of said CL.

Temporary easements during the period of construction to enter upon land of the Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Fish and Wildlife, for construction purposes, including the right to cut and dispose of all trees, down timber, stubs, brush, bushes,
and debris, in an area which contains 0.03 acre, more or less, and is located right of and between approximate stations 14 + 03 and 15 + 40 of said CL; and in an area which contains 0.01 acre, more or less, and is located right of
and between approximate stations 15 + 69 and 16 + 50 of said CL.

Included in this transfer is all right, title, and interest the Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Fish and Wildlife, has in and to any land which is located within the existing right-of-way of Vermont Route #107 between the northerly boundary
of Parcel #5B and the center of the Tweed River.

Dated February 25, 1992.

Executive Order No. 29-24
(No. 07-93) [Transfer of Property in Grand Isle From Agency of Administration, Department of State Buildings to Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Fish and Wildlife.

WHEREAS, it appears that certain land and premises located in the Town of Grand Isle, County of Grand Isle and State of Vermont, hereinafter described and presently under the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Administration, Department of State
Buildings, is no longer necessary for purposes of the Agency of Administration; and

WHEREAS, the Vermont Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Fish and Wildlife, desires the use of said land and premises for its purposes.

NOW THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED THAT I, Howard Dean, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor, do hereby transfer and set over from the Agency of Administration, Department of State Buildings, to the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Natural
Resources, Department of Fish and Wildlife, for its purposes the following described land and premises, to wit:

Being all of the same land and premises with buildings thereon acquired by the State of Vermont from J. M. Harford a/k/a Jan Michael Harford and Ellen Harford formerly Ellen R. Rattee, husband and wife, by Warranty Deed dated June 15, 1989, and recorded
in Book 45, Pages 2-4 of the Town of Grand Isle Land Records. Additionally, being all of the same land and premises with buildings thereon acquired by the State of Vermont from the J. & R. Williams Co., Inc., by Warranty Deed dated
June 8, 1989, and recorded in Book 44, Pages 507-508 of the Town of Grand Isle Land Records.

The parcels herein described, presently known as the Ed Weed Fish Culture Station, contain approximately 160 acres and are subject to the following conditions and encumbrances:

Memorandum of Understanding between the Grand Isle Board of Selectmen and the Department of State Buildings dated November 13, 1989.

Agriculture lease with Francis Dubuque dated January 23, 1992.

30-year lease to Lake Champlain Transportation for 1.15 acres and a 20-foot wide easement along Bell Hill Road to leased parcel dated March 15, 1991.

30-year lease to State of Vermont by Lake Champlain Transportation Company for a 0.09-acre parcel of shoreline property dated March 15, 1991.

All Land Use Permits issued by the State of Vermont for the Fish Hatchery construction project.

All conditions of the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers Permit #198901967 dated September 11, 1990, issued for the construction of the hatchery.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon signing.

Dated May 15, 1993.

Executive Order No. 29-25
(No. 12-93) [Transfer of Certain Lands and Rights in Charleston from Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Fish and Wildlife, to Agency of Transportation.

WHEREAS, It appears that certain lands and rights hereinafter described and located in the Town of Charleston, County of Orleans, and State of Vermont are presently under the jurisdiction and control of the State of Vermont, Agency of Natural Resources,
Department of Fish and Wildlife, and

WHEREAS, the Agency of Transportation desires the use of said lands and rights for its purposes;

NOW THEREFORE, I Howard Dean, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor of Vermont do hereby transfer and set over from the Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Fish and Wildlife, to the Agency of Transportation, jurisdiction and control over
certain lands and rights being more particularly described as follows:

Being part of the same land and premises conveyed to the State of Vermont, Fish and Game Department by Warranty Deed from Hiram H. Hutchinson and Hazel M. Hutchinson dated April 16, 1965, and recorded in Book 27, Pages 65 and 66 of the Town of Charleston
Land Records, and further described as Parcels #4A and 4B consisting of certain pieces of land and rights therein as shown on Page 9 of the plans of Highway Project Charleston BRF 034-3 (15) that have been revised and filed in the
office of the Clerk of the Town of Charleston on the 14th day of December, 1992. Said lands and rights are described as follows:

Parcel #4A:

Beginning at a point in the existing easterly right-of-way boundary of Vermont Route #105, 28 feet distant easterly radially from approximate station 433+45 of the established centerline (established centerline hereinafter referred to as CL) of Highway
Project Charleston BRF 034-3 (15);

thence 90 feet, more or less, southeasterly to a point in the Clyde River, said point being 30 feet distant easterly radially from approximate station 434+33 of said CL;

thence 23 feet, more or less, northwesterly in said Clyde River to a point in the aforesaid existing easterly right-of-way boundary of Vermont Route #105, 11 feet distant easterly radially from approximate station 434+22 of said CL;

thence 80 feet, more or less, northerly along the aforesaid existing easterly right-of-way boundary of Vermont Route #105 to the point of beginning.

The above described parcel of land designated Parcel #4A, consists of 0.02 acre, more or less.

Parcel #4B:

Beginning at a point in existing Vermont Route #105, 4 feet distant northeasterly radially from approximate station 432+58 of the aforesaid CL;

thence 26 feet, more or less, southeasterly to a point in the existing easterly right-of-way boundary of Vermont Route #105, 26 feet distant easterly radially from approximate station 432+70 of said CL;

thence 75 feet, more or less, southeasterly along the aforesaid easterly right-of-way boundary of Vermont Route #105, to a point 28 feet distant easterly radially from approximate station 433+45 of said CL;

thence 80 feet, more or less, southerly along said existing easterly right-of-way boundary of Vermont Route #105, to a point in the Clyde River 11 feet distant easterly radially from approximate station 434+22 of said CL;

thence 18 feet, more or less, northwesterly in the Clyde River to a point in existing Vermont Route #105, 5 feet distant westerly radially from approximate station 434+17 of said CL;

thence 160 feet, more or less, northerly and northwesterly along existing Vermont Route #105 to the point of beginning.

The above described parcel of land designated as Parcel #4B consists of 0.08 acre, more or less, and is located within the existing right-of-way of Vermont Route #105.

Also included in this transfer are the following described easements and/or rights:

A temporary easement during the period of construction, to extend highway slopes and embankments in an area of 0.03 acre, more or less, as shown on Page 9 of the aforementioned revised filed plans.

The slopes and embankments may be extended at such an angle as will hold the material of said slopes in repose against ordinary erosion in accordance with the standard practice of highway construction. The State of Vermont, Agency of Transportation, shall
have the right to remove all trees, logs, stumps, protruding roots, brush, duff and other objectionable materials, structures, growth and any other thing of whatever kind or nature from said slope areas.

An easement, in an area of 0.01 acre, more or less, to change and maintain the channel of a certain stream of water, known locally as the Clyde River, now running on lands of the Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Fish and wildlife, left of and
between approximate stations 433+56 and 433+90 of the established centerline of Highway Project Charleston BRF 034-3 (15).

A temporary easement during the period of construction to enter upon land of the Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Fish and Wildlife, to construct and utilize a temporary detour, in an area which contains 0.11 acre, more or less, and is located
left of and between approximate stations 432+90 and 434+55 of the said established centerline.

Dated August 15, 1993.

Executive Order No. 29-26
(No. 01-95) [Transfer of Land and Easements From Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Fish and Wildlife, to Agency of Transportation.

WHEREAS, it appears that certain land and easements in the Town of Roxbury, County of Washington, and State of Vermont which is presently under the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Natural resources, Department of Fish and Wildlife, is necessary
for highway purposes in connection with Highway Project Roxbury BRS 0187(3)S; and

WHEREAS, the Agency of Transportation is charged with and has the responsibility for planning, constructing, and maintaining all such highways,

NOW THEREFORE, I, Howard Dean, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor of Vermont do hereby transfer and set over to the Agency of Transportation, jurisdiction and control over certain land and easements of the Agency of Natural Resources, Department
of Fish and Wildlife, and being more particularly described as follows:

Being part of the same land and premises conveyed to the State of Vermont by the following instruments:

Quit-Claim Deed from Charles C. Warren dated November 30, 1894 and recorded in Book 16, Page 201, of the Town of Roxbury Land Records.

Warranty Deed from Edward H. Thurston and Ola M. Thurston dated September 21, 1956 and recorded in Book 28, Pages 85-87, of said Town of Roxbury Land Records. A portion of the land conveyed in this deed was transferred from the jurisdiction and control
of the Department of Highways to the jurisdiction and control of the Department of Fish and Game by Executive Order dated November 12, 1973 and recorded in Book 28, Page 531, of said Town of Roxbury Land Records.

The land and easements transferred herein are further described as Parcel #1 as shown on Pages 9 and 11 of the plans of Highway Project Roxbury BRS 0187 (3)S as filed on May 11, 1993 in the office of the Clerk of the Town of Roxbury.

The transfer includes all right, title, and interest which the Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Fish and Wildlife, has or may have in or to a parcel of land which contains approximately 0.51 acre and is located entirely within the existing right-of-way
of Vermont #12A. Said parcel is further described as follows:

Beginning at a point in the existing westerly right-of-way boundary of Vermont Route #12A, 50 feet distant westerly radiating from approximate station 118+00 of the established centerline (established centerline hereinafter referred to as CL) of Highway
Project Roxbury BRS 0187 (3)S;

thence 237 feet, more or less, northerly along said westerly right-of-way boundary of Vermont Route #12A, and crossing the Third Branch of the White River to a point 50 feet distant westerly at right angle from approximate station 120+43 of said CL;

thence 33 feet, more or less, northeasterly along said westerly right-of-way boundary of Vermont Route #12A to a point 25 feet distant westerly at a right angle from approximate station 124+65 of said CL;

thence 416 feet, more or less, northerly and easterly along said westerly right-of-way boundary of Vermont State Route #12A to a point 25 feet distant northwesterly at right angle from approximate station 124+65 of said CL;

thence 25 feet, more or less, southeasterly to a point in Vermont Route # 12A, at approximate station 124+65 on said CL;

thence 665 feet, more or less, southwesterly and southerly along Vermont #12A to a point at approximate station 118+00 on said CL;

thence 50 feet, more or less, westerly to the point of beginning.

Also included in this transfer are the following easements:

A temporary easement during the period of construction to enter upon land of the Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Fish and Wildlife, to construct a temporary bridge detour, in an area which contains 0.10 acre, more or less, and is located left
of and between approximate stations 119+85 and 122+24 of the aforesaid CL;

A permanent easement to extend and maintain highway slopes and embankments in an area of 0.10 acre, more or less, and temporary easements during the period during the period of construction, to extend highway slopes and embankments in an area of 0.10
acre, more or less, and in an area of 0.06 acre, more or less, as shown on the aforesaid filed plans.

The slopes and embankments may be extended at such an angle as will hold the material of said slopes in repose against ordinary erosion in accordance with the standard practice of highway construction. The State of Vermont, Agency of Transportation, shall
have the right to remove all trees, logs, stumps, protruding roots, brush, duff and other objectionable materials, structures, growth and any other thing of whatever kind or nature from said slope areas.

An easement, in an area of 0.10 acre, more or less, to change and maintain the channel of a certain stream of water, known locally as the Third Branch of the White River, now running on the lands of the Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Fish
and Wildlife, left of and between approximate stations 120+45 and 120+73 of said CL;

An easement to install and maintain a wingwall located left of and between approximate stations 120+69 and 120+80 of said CL;

A temporary easement during the period of construction to enter upon land of the Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Fish and Wildlife, to reset two white pine trees located left of and between approximate stations 121+15 and 121+70 of said CL;

A temporary easement during the period of construction to enter upon land of the Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Fish and Wildlife, to construct a drive at or near and left of approximate station 122+50 of said CL.

Dated January 9, 1995.

Executive Order No. 29-27
(No. 07-99) [Transfer of Property in Essex to Agency of Administration, Department of State Buildings and General Services from Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation.

WHEREAS, certain buildings and related land (the “property”) located in the Town of Essex, County of Chittenden and State of Vermont, herein after described, are presently under the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Natural Resources, Department
of Forests, Parks and Recreation (ANR) and;

WHEREAS, the ANR has no further use for the property; and

WHEREAS, the Vermont Agency of Administration, Department of Buildings and General Services, desires the use of said buildings and related land for its purposes;

NOW, THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED THAT I, Howard Dean, M.D., by the power vested in me as Governor of the State of Vermont, do hereby transfer and set over to the Agency of Administration, Department of State Buildings and General Services, from the jurisdiction
and control of the Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation, for its purposes, the following described land and premises, to wit:

Being the buildings and related land located on east side of Old Colchester road so-called. The northerly part of said property being situated in the Town of Essex and the southerly part being situated in the Village of Essex Junction.

Meaning hereby to transfer jurisdiction over the remaining part of the same premises and land conveyed to the State of Vermont by Charles E. Labelle and Lumina E. Labelle, husband and wife, by their Warranty Deed dated August 12, 1963. Said deed being
of record in book 67 at page 449 of the Town of Essex Land Records.

As an aid to the location of the herein transferred premises, reference is made to a land plat entitled “Old Colchester Road Nursery,” scale: 1" = 200´, compiled by: M.E. Raboin, dated: February ’82, Drawing No. 000-7. Said plat being filed in the property
records of the State of Vermont; Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation at Waterbury, Vermont. Attachment A attached hereto and incorporated herewith.

Said property consists of certain buildings and structures which are more particularly described in Attachment B attached hereto and incorporated herewith, as well as approximately 99.1 acres, more or less, of related land. Said premises and land are
subject to the following conditions and encumbrances:

A certain lease entered into between the Agency of Natural Resources, Department of Forests, Parks and Recreation and the Town of Essex and the Village of Essex Junction, dated June 30, 1998, and recorded in the Town of Essex Land Records at Book 388,
Pages 706-713.

A certain Fence Division Agreement between the State of Vermont, Department of Forests and Parks and Guy L. and Florence McGuin, dated November 3, 1958, and recorded in the Town of Essex Land Records at Book 65, Page 271.

A certain Fence Division Agreement between the State of Vermont, Department of Forests and Parks and Lawrence and Katherine Thompson, dated February 7, 1962, and recorded in the Town of Essex Land Records at Book 65, Page 272.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon execution.

Dated June 14, 1999.

Executive Order No. 29-28
(No. 01-01) [Transfer of Property in Rutland from Military Department to Agency of Administration, Department of State Buildings and General Services.

WHEREAS, it appears that certain land and premises located on Pierpoint Avenue in the City of Rutland, County of Rutland and State of Vermont, hereinafter described and presently under the jurisdiction and control of the Military Department, State of
Vermont, currently used as a military maintenance facility; and

WHEREAS, certain land was obtained by the Military Department, located in Fair Haven, Vermont, and the Military Department is in the process of constructing a new military maintenance facility at that location; and

WHEREAS, once the Fair Haven Maintenance facility is completed, anticipated completion date to be by the end of year 2001, the land and premises located in the City of Rutland, County of Rutland, State of Vermont, will no longer be necessary for the purposes
of the Military Department; and

WHEREAS, the Agency of Administration, Department of State Buildings and General Services, desires the use of said land and premises for its purposes.

NOW, THEREFORE, BE IT RESOLVED, that I, Howard Dean, by virtue of the power vested in me as Governor, do hereby transfer and set over from the Military Department to the jurisdiction and control of the Agency of Administration Department of Buildings
and General Services for its purposes, the date of transfer of possession to be upon completion of the Fair Haven, Vermont, maintenance facility, the following described land and premises, to wit:

Being part of the same land and premises acquired by the State of Vermont from Evelyn Pierpoint, et al. by Warranty Deed dated June 29, 1877, and recorded in Book 36, Pages 657-658 of the City of Rutland Land Records. It is also the same land and premises
transferred from the Agency of Administration, Department of Buildings to the Military Department by Executive Order No. 23-86 and being more particularly described as follows:

Beginning at a point marked with a stone bound on the easterly sideline of Pierpoint Avenue approximately 685 feet northerly of the center line of State Street, which now marks the division line between the lands of the State of Vermont and the land herein
described, thence running northerly along a bearing of N 1°13´09" E a distance of 295.0 feet to an Iron Pin set flush (IPSF), thence running in a northerly direction along an arc of a circle with a radius of 692.05´ curving to the
right an arc distance of 221.14 l.f. along the easterly boundary of Pierpoint Avenue, the chord of said arc running N 10°22´21" E for a distance of 220.19 feet, thence running N 19°31´38" E for a distance of 29.59 feet, thence continuing
in a northerly direction along an arc of a circle with a radius of 1170.75 feet curving to the left an arc distance of 130.50 feet along the easterly boundary of Pierpoint Avenue, the chord of such arc running N 16°19´59" E for a distance
of 130.43 feet to an Iron Pin Set Flush, thence turning a sharp angle to the right and running S 35°25´24" E for a distance of 561.03 feet to a point in the East Creek (this line is the division line of property deeded to the City
of Rutland by the State, June 9, 1956, and recorded in BK 103, PG. 117, and land therein described), thence turning a sharp angle to the right and running S 32°58´31" W for a distance of 8.41 feet to a point in the East Creek, thence
turning a slight angle to the left and running S 20°20´40" W for a distance of 194.37 feet to a point, thence turning a slight angle to the left and running S 13°52´20" W for a distance of 25.00 feet more or less to a point in East
Creek, thence turning a sharp angle to the right and running N 87°37´40" W for a distance of 340.0 feet more or less to the point of beginning.

The parcel therein described contains approximately 4.15 acres, more or less.

FURTHER, the Military Department shall remain responsible for maintenance and any expenses relating to the above described land and premises until such time as it vacates the property and turns possession over to the Agency of Administration Department
of Buildings and General Services. In addition, the Military Department shall transfer all property records and files, relating to the above described land and premises, to the Agency of Administration Department of Buildings and General
Services at the time possession of said property is transferred to that Agency.

This Executive Order shall take effect upon execution.

Dated January 8, 2001.